Washington statutes.
RCW 7.43.110

Violation of injunction—Contempt of court.

An intentional violation of a restraining order, preliminary injunction, or order of abatement under this chapter is a contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.

[ 1989 c 373 s 9; 1988 c 141 s 14.]